Idaho, session 2026, H0586.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 83, Title 67, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 83
FINANCIAL ACCOUNTABILITY STABLECOIN TRANSACTION (FAST) ACT
67-8301. SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"FAST Act."
67-8302. DECLARATION OF NECESSITY. The legislature finds that:
(1) Timely and efficient payment of obligations to state vendors and
contractors is essential to the operation of state government;
(2) The use of payment stablecoins backed by U.S. dollar-denominated
reserves may reduce transaction costs, improve financial transparency, and
expedite payment delivery;
(3) The federal guiding and establishing national innovation for U.S.
stablecoins act (GENIUS act), P.L. 119-27, establishes a comprehensive fed-
eral framework governing payment stablecoins, including issuer qualifica-
tion, reserve standards, consumer protections, and enforcement;
(4) States are authorized under the GENIUS act to recognize and use per-
mitted payment stablecoin issuers and to adopt substantially similar frame-
works for oversight of state-level usage; and
(5) It is the purpose of this chapter to authorize the state to recog-
nize and use privately issued payment stablecoins qualified under the GENIUS
act and state-issued, public purpose-qualified stablecoins.
67-8303. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Authorized payment stablecoin" means a GENIUS-qualified or pub-
lic purpose-qualified stablecoin that has been authorized for state use pur-
suant to section 67-8304, Idaho Code.
(2) "GENIUS-qualified stablecoin" means a payment stablecoin that is:


(a) Approved, certified, listed, or otherwise authorized under the GE-
NIUS act, including any rule, order, or regulation issued pursuant to
the GENIUS act;
(b) Fully backed on a one-to-one basis by U.S. dollars or U.S. treasury
obligations;
(c) Redeemable at par value on demand;
(d) Fungible and transferable on regulated banking platforms, ex-
changes, or open markets;
(e) Sufficient for operational scale and market usage, demonstrating
no less than two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) in aggregate trans-
action volume during the preceding twelve (12) months, as verified
through publicly available disclosures, independent audits, or other
reliable documentation acceptable to the state treasurer and the state
controller; and
(f) Issued by a corporation or entity:
(i) That is incorporated and headquartered in the United States;
(ii) Whose corporate founders are United States citizens;
(iii) Whose controlling shareholders are United States citizens;
(iv) That maintains reserves in accounts held in banks chartered
within the United States or with federally regulated custodians;
(v) That is subject to quarterly independent attestations by an
accounting firm that is currently registered with the public com-
pany accounting oversight board; and
(vi) That publishes monthly reserve reports disclosing asset com-
position and location.
(3) "Public purpose-qualified stablecoin" means any public entity
stablecoin issued by a U.S. state and fully backed by U.S. dollars or U.S.
treasury obligations with statutory over-collateralization. Public pur-
pose-qualified stablecoins must provide a public benefit to Idaho through a
revenue-sharing agreement or substantially similar benefit agreement.
67-8304. LIST OF AUTHORIZED PAYMENT STABLECOINS -- REPORT. (1) An-
nually, by January 1, the state treasurer and the state controller, acting
jointly, shall maintain and publish a list of payment stablecoins that are
GENIUS-qualified or public purpose-qualified and have been authorized for
use in state payments. The state treasurer and the state controller, acting
jointly, may suspend or revoke authorization of any payment stablecoin that
no longer maintains GENIUS or public purpose qualification or that presents
material risk to state operations.
(2) Annually, by December 15, the state treasurer and the state con-
troller, acting jointly, shall submit a report to the legislature through
the portal provided pursuant to section 67-705, Idaho Code. The report shall
be made available to the public and shall include:
(a) The current list of authorized payment stablecoins;
(b) Any suspended or revoked stablecoins;
(c) Transaction volumes and estimated cost savings to the state; and
(d) How the use of authorized payment stablecoins will:
(i) Provide demonstrable fiscal benefits, revenue opportuni-
ties, or cost savings to the state;


(ii) Enhance transparency, auditability, or financial stability;
or
(iii) Promote competition and innovation within U.S. financial
infrastructure.
(3) The state treasurer and the state controller, acting jointly, shall
establish procedures for risk assessment, compliance, and safeguards.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, the legislature may suspend or revoke the authorization of any pay-
ment stablecoin by adopting a concurrent resolution or through the enact-
ment of a law amending or superseding a list of stablecoins that have been au-
thorized for use in state payments by the state treasurer and the state con-
troller.
67-8305. STATE USE OF AUTHORIZED PAYMENT STABLECOINS. (1) The state
may use authorized payment stablecoins as authorized jointly by the state
treasurer and the state controller to make payments to vendors and contrac-
tors.
(2) A vendor or contractor may elect, but shall not be required, to re-
ceive payment in an authorized payment stablecoin.
(3) Payments made using an authorized payment stablecoin shall be
deemed valid, final, and enforceable as satisfaction of monetary obliga-
tions owed by the state.
(4) Prior to electing to receive payment in an authorized payment sta-
blecoin, a vendor or contractor shall be provided disclosures relating to
redemption rights, reserve backing, audit standards, and digital-asset cus-
tody risks.
(5) The state treasurer and the state controller, acting jointly, shall
establish secure systems and procedures for the use of authorized payment
stablecoins and may contract with private entities to implement necessary
infrastructure.
(6) The state treasurer and the state controller, acting jointly, shall
coordinate with applicable federal regulators to ensure compliance with the
GENIUS act and with applicable state regulators to ensure compliance with
public purpose regulations and shall not impose issuer requirements incon-
sistent with federal law.
67-8306. INTERSTATE COORDINATION. The state treasurer and the state
controller, acting jointly, are authorized to enter into memoranda of under-
standing, cooperative agreements, or information-sharing arrangements with
other states and with federal agencies for the evaluation, integration, or
utilization of public purpose-qualified stablecoins.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.